sn_ZW/sn_ZW.aff
PFX A 0 zvazvakarwu/G . 
PFX A 0 zvazvakati/G . 
PFX A 0 zvazvakatu/G . 
PFX A 0 zvazvakatwu/G . 
PFX A 0 zvazvakau/G . 
PFX A 0 zvazvakava/G . 
PFX A 0 zvazvakawa/G . 
PFX A 0 zvazvakazvi/G . 
PFX A 0 zvazvaku/G . 
PFX A 0 zvazvamu/G . 
PFX A 0 zvazvandi/G . 
PFX A 0 zvazvapa/G . 
PFX A 0 zvazvari/G . 
PFX A 0 zvazvaru/G . 
PFX A 0 zvazvarwu/G . 
PFX A 0 zvazvati/G . 
PFX A 0 zvazvatu/G . 
PFX A 0 zvazvatwu/G . 
PFX A 0 zvazvau/G . 
PFX A 0 zvazvava/G . 
PFX A 0 zvazvawa/G . 
PFX A 0 zvazvazvi/G . 
PFX A 0 zvazvi/D . 
PFX A 0 zvazvino/G . 
PFX A 0 zvazvinoku/F . 
PFX A 0 zvazvinoku/G . 
PFX A 0 zvazvinosi/G . 
PFX A 0 zve/G . 
PFX A 0 zveku/G . 
PFX A 0 zvekusa . 
PFX A 0 zvekusa/G . 
PFX A 0 zvemuku . 
PFX A 0 zvemuku/G . 
PFX A 0 zvemuma . 
PFX A 0 zvemuma/G . 
PFX A 0 zvi/CDF . 
PFX A 0 zvicha/D . 
PFX A 0 zvicha/F . 
PFX A 0 zvicha/G . 
PFX A 0 zvichaa/D . 
PFX A 0 zvichachi/D . 
PFX A 0 zvichado/D . 
PFX A 0 zvichadzi/D . 
PFX A 0 zvichafano/D . 
PFX A 0 zvichafumo/D . 
PFX A 0 zvichagaro/D . 
PFX A 0 zvichago/D . 
PFX A 0 zvichahu/D . 
PFX A 0 zvichahwu/D . 
PFX A 0 zvichai/D . 
PFX A 0 zvichaisvo/D . 
PFX A 0 zvichaka/D . 
PFX A 0 zvichaku/D . 
PFX A 0 zvichambo/D . 
PFX A 0 zvichamu/D . 
PFX A 0 zvichandi/D . 
PFX A 0 zvichando/D . 
PFX A 0 zvichango/D . 
PFX A 0 zvichanguno/D . 
PFX A 0 zvichano/D . 
PFX A 0 zvichanyanyo/D . 
PFX A 0 zvichanyatso/D . 
PFX A 0 zvichapa/D . 
PFX A 0 zvichari/D . 
PFX A 0 zvicharu/D . 
PFX A 0 zvicharwu/D . 
PFX A 0 zvichasi/D . 
PFX A 0 zvichasvikiro/D . 
PFX A 0 zvichasviko/D . 
PFX A 0 zvichaswero/D . 
PFX A 0 zvichati/D . 
PFX A 0 zvichato/D . 
PFX A 0 zvichatu/D . 
PFX A 0 zvichatwu/D . 
PFX A 0 zvichau/D . 
PFX A 0 zvichava/D . 
PFX A 0 zvichawa/D . 
PFX A 0 zvichawanzo/D . 
PFX A 0 zvichazai/D . 
PFX A 0 zvichazo/D . 
PFX A 0 zvichazvi/D . 
PFX A 0 zvichi/G . 
PFX A 0 zvichido/D . 
PFX A 0 zvichifano/D . 
PFX A 0 zvichifumo/D . 
PFX A 0 zvichigaro/D . 
PFX A 0 zvichigo/D . 
PFX A 0 zvichiisvo/D . 
PFX A 0 zvichimbo/D . 
PFX A 0 zvichindo/D . 
PFX A 0 zvichingo/D . 
PFX A 0 zvichinguno/D . 
PFX A 0 zvichino/D . 
PFX A 0 zvichinyanyo/D . 
PFX A 0 zvichinyatso/D . 
PFX A 0 zvichisi/D . 
PFX A 0 zvichisvikiro/D . 
PFX A 0 zvichisviko/D . 
PFX A 0 zvichiswero/D . 
PFX A 0 zvichito/D . 
PFX A 0 zvichiwanzo/D . 
PFX A 0 zvichizai/D . 
PFX A 0 zvichizo/D . 
PFX A 0 zvika/G . 
PFX A 0 zvikado/D . 
PFX A 0 zvikafano/D . 
PFX A 0 zvikafumo/D . 
PFX A 0 zvikagaro/D . 
PFX A 0 zvikago/D . 
PFX A 0 zvikaisvo/D . 
PFX A 0 zvikambo/D . 
PFX A 0 zvikando/D . 
PFX A 0 zvikango/D . 
PFX A 0 zvikanguno/D . 
PFX A 0 zvikano/D . 
PFX A 0 zvikanyanyo/D . 
PFX A 0 zvikanyatso/D . 
PFX A 0 zvikasi/D . 
PFX A 0 zvikasvikiro/D . 
PFX A 0 zvikasviko/D . 
PFX A 0 zvikaswero/D . 
PFX A 0 zvikato/D . 
PFX A 0 zvikawanzo/D . 
PFX A 0 zvikazai/D . 
PFX A 0 zvikazo/D . 
PFX A 0 zvinga/D . 
PFX A 0 zvinga/G . 
PFX A 0 zvingaa/D . 
PFX A 0 zvingachi/D . 
PFX A 0 zvingado/D . 
PFX A 0 zvingadzi/D . 
PFX A 0 zvingafano/D . 
PFX A 0 zvingafumo/D . 
PFX A 0 zvingagaro/D . 
PFX A 0 zvingago/D . 
PFX A 0 zvingahu/D . 
PFX A 0 zvingahwu/D . 
PFX A 0 zvingai/D . 
PFX A 0 zvingaisvo/D . 
PFX A 0 zvingaka/D . 
PFX A 0 zvingaku/D . 
PFX A 0 zvingambo/D . 
PFX A 0 zvingamu/D . 
PFX A 0 zvingandi/D . 
PFX A 0 zvingando/D . 
PFX A 0 zvingango/D . 
PFX A 0 zvinganguno/D . 
PFX A 0 zvingano/D . 
PFX A 0 zvinganyanyo/D . 
PFX A 0 zvinganyatso/D . 
PFX A 0 zvingapa/D . 
PFX A 0 zvingari/D . 
PFX A 0 zvingaru/D . 
PFX A 0 zvingarwu/D . 
PFX A 0 zvingasi/D . 
PFX A 0 zvingasvikiro/D . 
PFX A 0 zvingasviko/D . 
PFX A 0 zvingaswero/D . 
PFX A 0 zvingati/D . 
PFX A 0 zvingato/D . 
PFX A 0 zvingatu/D . 
PFX A 0 zvingatwu/D . 
PFX A 0 zvingau/D . 
PFX A 0 zvingava/D . 
PFX A 0 zvingawa/D . 
PFX A 0 zvingawanzo/D . 
PFX A 0 zvingazai/D . 
PFX A 0 zvingazo/D . 
PFX A 0 zvingazvi/D . 
PFX A 0 zvino/D . 
PFX A 0 zvino/F . 
PFX A 0 zvino/G . 
PFX A 0 zvinoa/D . 
PFX A 0 zvinochi/D . 
PFX A 0 zvinodo/D . 
PFX A 0 zvinodzi/D . 
PFX A 0 zvinofano/D . 
PFX A 0 zvinofumo/D . 
PFX A 0 zvinogaro/D . 
PFX A 0 zvinogo/D . 
PFX A 0 zvinohu/D . 
PFX A 0 zvinohwu/D . 
PFX A 0 zvinoi/D . 
PFX A 0 zvinoisvo/D . 
PFX A 0 zvinoka/D . 
PFX A 0 zvinoku/D . 
PFX A 0 zvinombo/D . 
PFX A 0 zvinomu/D . 
PFX A 0 zvinondi/D . 
PFX A 0 zvinondo/D . 
PFX A 0 zvinongo/D . 
PFX A 0 zvinonguno/D . 
PFX A 0 zvinono/D . 
PFX A 0 zvinonyanyo/D . 
PFX A 0 zvinonyatso/D . 
PFX A 0 zvinopa/D . 
PFX A 0 zvinori/D . 
PFX A 0 zvinoru/D . 
PFX A 0 zvinorwu/D . 
PFX A 0 zvinosi/D . 
PFX A 0 zvinosvikiro/D . 
PFX A 0 zvinosviko/D . 
PFX A 0 zvinoswero/D . 
PFX A 0 zvinoti/D . 
PFX A 0 zvinoto/D . 
PFX A 0 zvinotu/D . 
PFX A 0 zvinotwu/D . 
PFX A 0 zvinou/D . 
PFX A 0 zvinova/D . 
PFX A 0 zvinowa/D . 
PFX A 0 zvinowanzo/D . 
PFX A 0 zvinozai/D . 
PFX A 0 zvinozo/D . 
PFX A 0 zvinozvi/D . 
PFX A 0 zvisa/D . 
PFX A 0 zvisado/D . 
PFX A 0 zvisafano/D . 
PFX A 0 zvisafumo/D . 
PFX A 0 zvisagaro/D . 
PFX A 0 zvisago/D . 
PFX A 0 zvisaisvo/D . 
PFX A 0 zvisambo/D . 
PFX A 0 zvisando/D . 
PFX A 0 zvisango/D . 
PFX A 0 zvisanguno/D . 
PFX A 0 zvisano/D . 
PFX A 0 zvisanyanyo/D . 
PFX A 0 zvisanyatso/D . 
PFX A 0 zvisasi/D . 
PFX A 0 zvisasvikiro/D . 
PFX A 0 zvisasviko/D . 
PFX A 0 zvisaswero/D . 
PFX A 0 zvisato/D . 
PFX A 0 zvisawanzo/D . 
PFX A 0 zvisazai/D . 
PFX A 0 zvisazo/D . 
PFX A 0 zvisinga/D . 
PFX A 0 zvisingado/D . 
PFX A 0 zvisingafano/D . 
PFX A 0 zvisingafumo/D . 
PFX A 0 zvisingagaro/D . 
PFX A 0 zvisingago/D . 
PFX A 0 zvisingaisvo/D . 
PFX A 0 zvisingambo/D . 
PFX A 0 zvisingando/D . 
PFX A 0 zvisingango/D . 
PFX A 0 zvisinganguno/D . 
PFX A 0 zvisingano/D . 
PFX A 0 zvisinganyanyo/D . 
PFX A 0 zvisinganyatso/D . 
PFX A 0 zvisingasi/D . 
PFX A 0 zvisingasvikiro/D . 
PFX A 0 zvisingasviko/D . 
PFX A 0 zvisingaswero/D . 
PFX A 0 zvisingato/D . 
PFX A 0 zvisingawanzo/D . 
PFX A 0 zvisingazai/D . 
PFX A 0 zvisingazo/D . 
PFX A 0 zvisisa/D . 
PFX A 0 zvisisado/D . 
PFX A 0 zvisisafano/D . 
PFX A 0 zvisisafumo/D . 
PFX A 0 zvisisagaro/D . 
PFX A 0 zvisisago/D . 
PFX A 0 zvisisaisvo/D . 
PFX A 0 zvisisambo/D . 
PFX A 0 zvisisando/D . 
PFX A 0 zvisisango/D . 
PFX A 0 zvisisanguno/D . 
PFX A 0 zvisisano/D . 
PFX A 0 zvisisanyanyo/D . 
PFX A 0 zvisisanyatso/D . 
PFX A 0 zvisisasi/D . 
PFX A 0 zvisisasvikiro/D . 
PFX A 0 zvisisasviko/D . 
PFX A 0 zvisisaswero/D . 
PFX A 0 zvisisato/D . 
PFX A 0 zvisisawanzo/D . 
PFX A 0 zvisisazai/D . 
PFX A 0 zvisisazo/D . 
PFX A 0 zvoa/G . 
PFX A 0 zvochi/G . 
PFX A 0 zvodzi/G . 
PFX A 0 zvohu/G . 
PFX A 0 zvohwu/G . 
PFX A 0 zvoi/G . 
PFX A 0 zvoka/G . 
PFX A 0 zvoku/G . 
PFX A 0 zvomu/G . 
PFX A 0 zvondi/G . 
PFX A 0 zvopa/G . 
PFX A 0 zvori/G . 
PFX A 0 zvoru/G . 
PFX A 0 zvorwu/G . 
PFX A 0 zvoti/G . 
PFX A 0 zvotu/G . 
PFX A 0 zvotwu/G . 
PFX A 0 zvou/G . 
PFX A 0 zvova/G . 
PFX A 0 zvowa/G . 
PFX A 0 zvozvi/G . 
