sn_ZW/sn_ZW.dic
ambutsa/AVQ
ata/AVQ
baduka/AVQ
bangaradza/AVQ
bararadza/AVQ
batisisa/AVQ
bayirwa/AVQ
bereka/AVQ
beura/AVQ
bhadhariswa/AVQ
bhamadza/AVQ
bhebhudza/AVQ
bhemera/AVQ
bhidhirika/AVQ
bhodyora/AVQ
bhowa/AVQ
bhugumuka/AVQ
bhuruvarisa/AVQ
bidinura/AVQ
bindikita/AVQ
bipitira/AVQ
bitirwa/AVQ
bodoka/AVQ
bomodza/AVQ
bonoka/AVQ
bopomora/AVQ
bubuna/AVQ
bududza/AVQ
bumbira/AVQ
bungata/AVQ
buruka/AVQ
buya/AVQ
bvanganidza/AVQ
bvarapfata/AVQ
bvekecha/AVQ
bvira/AVQ
bvocha/AVQ
bvonyongedza/AVQ
bvovoka/AVQ
bvujunura/AVQ
bvuma/AVQ
bvumisa/AVQ
bvunganisa/AVQ
bvurubvujuka/AVQ
bvutira/AVQ
bwaira/AVQ
bwazhamura/AVQ
bwerebweta/AVQ
bwibwinya/AVQ
bwitira/AVQ
chabudza/AVQ
chachanya/AVQ
chakanya/AVQ
chapaza/AVQ
chechenyedza/AVQ
chekerera/AVQ
chengetesa/AVQ
cheredza/AVQ
chichinha/AVQ
chinjanisa/AVQ
chochomara/AVQ
chovha/AVQ
dadama/AVQ
dambukisa/AVQ
datanyara/AVQ
dekaira/AVQ
denha/AVQ
deurisa/AVQ
dhanganyika/AVQ
dhidha/AVQ
dhiriza/AVQ
dhovoza/AVQ
dhusvura/AVQ
dimura/AVQ
dodocha/AVQ
donongodza/AVQ
duhumura/AVQ
dunura/AVQ
dyarurura/AVQ
dzadzuka/AVQ
dzatisa/AVQ
dzidzinuka/AVQ
dzimatidza/AVQ
dzinin'ina/AVQ
dziyisa/AVQ
dzonyera/AVQ
dzungunyika/AVQ
dzvatsva/AVQ
dzvonyoka/AVQ
ema-ema/AVQ
engura/AVQ
fadza/AVQ
fananidzira/AVQ
fararika/AVQ
fefemura/AVQ
femera/AVQ
fenya/AVQ
feva/AVQ
finyuka/AVQ
fokonora/AVQ
fonyora/AVQ
fozoka/AVQ
fufura/AVQ
fukira/AVQ
fumhidza/AVQ
fundunura/AVQ
funyisa/AVQ
furiridza/AVQ
fushura/AVQ
fuzhuka/AVQ
gadzikana/AVQ
gamhidzana/AVQ
ganhurana/AVQ
gava/AVQ
gijima/AVQ
gogona/AVQ
gonda/AVQ
gova/AVQ
guduza/AVQ
gumbatira/AVQ
gumura/AVQ
gurugudika/AVQ
gutswaira/AVQ
gwadarika/AVQ
gwatidza/AVQ
gwedurira/AVQ
gwindirika/AVQ
hara/AVQ
homa-homa/AVQ
hwahwata/AVQ
hwerura/AVQ
imbira/AVQ
isisa/AVQ
jakaidza/AVQ
jeka/AVQ
johona/AVQ
kaba-kaba/AVQ
kakachika/AVQ
kakaura/AVQ
kanangura/AVQ
kanganwika/AVQ
kanyangadza/AVQ
kararadza/AVQ
kata/AVQ
kavangura/AVQ
kerekera/AVQ
kobvora/AVQ
kodzeka/AVQ
kokora/AVQ
komekedza/AVQ
kononda/AVQ
koreka/AVQ
koshiwa/AVQ
kotsiriswa/AVQ
kuchidzira/AVQ
kukuta/AVQ
kumira/AVQ
kunha/AVQ
kurisa/AVQ
kusvuma/AVQ
kuvanidza/AVQ
kwachuka/AVQ
kwamurana/AVQ
kwara/AVQ
kwatuka/AVQ
kwekweta/AVQ
kweshana/AVQ
kwidibika/AVQ
kwitima/AVQ
mandana/AVQ
maramadza/AVQ
mbimbiny'ara/AVQ
mbunyanidza/AVQ
memedza/AVQ
mhanyirira/AVQ
mhura/AVQ
mitisa/AVQ
monya/AVQ
munyaira/AVQ
mvirinyinyika/AVQ
mwaraura/AVQ
mwetura/AVQ
nakidzwa/AVQ
nanaidza/AVQ
nangisika/AVQ
navaira/AVQ
ndengenyeka/AVQ
ndondodza/AVQ
ndwaira/AVQ
nengaidza/AVQ
n'eura/AVQ
ngengeredza/AVQ
ngoshora/AVQ
ngurungunda/AVQ
ngwarira/AVQ
nhanhaira/AVQ
nhonhota/AVQ
ningudza/AVQ
njandaika/AVQ
njenjema/AVQ
noka/AVQ
nonota/AVQ
nwadaira/AVQ
nyakaira/AVQ
nyandura/AVQ
nyanyasa/AVQ
nyaudza/AVQ
nyenga/AVQ
nyerera/AVQ
nyika/AVQ
nyobika/AVQ
nyon'onya/AVQ
nyungudika/AVQ
nzika/AVQ
nzvenga/AVQ
nzwisiso/AVQ
omera/AVQ
onisa/AVQ
ozha/AVQ
pafavara/AVQ
pakicha/AVQ
pamhakuta/AVQ
pandambarisa/AVQ
panika/AVQ
paradzana/AVQ
paringa/AVQ
patika/AVQ
pazaura/AVQ
pema/AVQ
pengera/AVQ
pereka/AVQ
pesera/AVQ
pfachaira/AVQ
pfarapfatika/AVQ
pfenyedzera/AVQ
pfimba/AVQ
pfodogora/AVQ
pfudugura/AVQ
pfukuchuka/AVQ
pfumbura/AVQ
pfundira/AVQ
pfupfudzika/AVQ
pfurunura/AVQ
pfuurika/AVQ
pikisana/AVQ
pindira/AVQ
pininga/AVQ
pipitira/AVQ
pishinura/AVQ
pofomara/AVQ
pomoka/AVQ
posa/AVQ
pozvoka/AVQ
pukutira/AVQ
punhaira/AVQ
pupurika/AVQ
puruvurika/AVQ
putudza/AVQ
pwashamadza/AVQ
pwitidza/AVQ
radyangura/AVQ
rakatika/AVQ
randura/AVQ
rapisa/AVQ
rasisa/AVQ
razvura/AVQ
regeresa/AVQ
remedza/AVQ
rerembuka/AVQ
rezura/AVQ
rigira/AVQ
ringana/AVQ
ririsa/AVQ
romba/AVQ
ropofadza/AVQ
rovedzera/AVQ
rudugura/AVQ
rumirira/AVQ
rurira/AVQ
rwerwa/AVQ
saidza/AVQ
sakurira/AVQ
sanha/AVQ
sasana/AVQ
sekedza/AVQ
senenedza/AVQ
serudza/AVQ
shahwahwa/AVQ
shambadzira/AVQ
shangazhika/AVQ
shashamura/AVQ
shededeka/AVQ
shezhenuka/AVQ
shiringinya/AVQ
shodora/AVQ
shonyombora/AVQ
shota/AVQ
shunika/AVQ
shuwarara/AVQ
shwetera/AVQ
simidza/AVQ
sipina/AVQ
soka/AVQ
sonzira/AVQ
suka/AVQ
sunatira/AVQ
sunha/AVQ
surura/AVQ
svada/AVQ
svatuka/AVQ
sveta/AVQ
svikira/AVQ
svisva/AVQ
svomoka/AVQ
svotonora/AVQ
svusvura/AVQ
swerera/AVQ
tadzisa/AVQ
takatira/AVQ
tambudza/AVQ
tanda/AVQ
tangayisa/AVQ
tanyangira/AVQ
tapura/AVQ
tarisa/AVQ
tatanura/AVQ
taurira/AVQ
teeneka/AVQ
tekerera/AVQ
temera/AVQ
tenderudza/AVQ
tenheka/AVQ
tepukira/AVQ
tetekera/AVQ
tetsvaira/AVQ
tibura/AVQ
tikitirisa/AVQ
tinha/AVQ
tirira/AVQ
tochora/AVQ
tomutsa/AVQ
tonongora/AVQ
tozomora/AVQ
tsamwira/AVQ
tsarukana/AVQ
tsaya-tsaya/AVQ
tseneka/AVQ
tsidiguka/AVQ
tsikisa/AVQ
tsinga/AVQ
tsitsa/AVQ
tsokota/AVQ
tsonyombodza/AVQ
tsukutana/AVQ
tsunya-tsunya/AVQ
tsvagiridza/AVQ
tsvatika/AVQ
tsvenengeka/AVQ
tsvikitidza/AVQ
tsvokonyora/AVQ
tswanyira/AVQ
tugudura/AVQ
tukunyutsa/AVQ
tundumara/AVQ
tununika/AVQ
turira/AVQ
tutumuka/AVQ
twara/AVQ
tyisa/AVQ
udza/AVQ
unarara/AVQ
unguka/AVQ
urunga/AVQ
vadura/AVQ
vandarira/AVQ
varairwa/AVQ
vaya/AVQ
verengesa/AVQ
vhakachira/AVQ
vheeretsa/AVQ
vhetura/AVQ
vhinza/AVQ
vhizungura/AVQ
vhumbama/AVQ
vhundurira/AVQ
vhuruvhutsa/AVQ
vimbisa/AVQ
vivana/AVQ
wabvura/AVQ
wanikidza/AVQ
wataira/AVQ
wesa/AVQ
wona/AVQ
wunduka/AVQ
yananisa/AVQ
yema/AVQ
yevedza/AVQ
zamura/AVQ
zeerera/AVQ
zerera/AVQ
zhaurira/AVQ
zhodoka/AVQ
zira/AVQ
zora/AVQ
zununguka/AVQ
zvambura/AVQ
zvimba/AVQ
zvirova/AVQ
zvuuruka/AVQ
